Illinois, session 104th, SB33.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Governmental Ethics Act is amended 5by changing Section 3-203 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 420/3-203)  (from Ch. 127, par. 603-203)7    Sec. 3-203. When, despite the existence of a conflict 8situation, a legislator chooses to take official action on a 9matter, he or she should serve the public interest, and not the 10interest of any person. The legislator shall also disclose 11that he or she is taking official action by filing a statement 12with the Clerk of the House of Representatives or the 13Secretary of the Senate, as applicable, stating that the 14legislator has a conflict regarding the specified legislative 15matter and that the legislator is voting in the public 16interest. Any statement filed with the Clerk of the House of 17Representatives or the Secretary of the Senate under this 18Section shall be made a part of the official record of the 19legislation and posted on the Illinois General Assembly 20website with other documents related to the legislative matter 21at issue. 22(Source: Laws 1967, p. 3401.)   SB0033- 2 -LRB104 05629 BDA 15659 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.